Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of  ORS 431A.855 to
431A.900.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Health Authority, or a third party with whom  the authority
has contracted,  may use the health information technology system described in ORS 431A.865
(3) to notify a practitioner  when the practitioner’s patient has experienced a fatal or nonfatal
overdose within one year from the date on which a drug prescribed by  the practitioner was
dispensed to the patient.
(2) The authority or a third  party may only use practitioner information under sub-
section (1) of this section to identify  the practitioners of a patient who has overdosed and
to provide notification of the overdose to the practitioners.
(3) The authority or a third party may retain the practitioner information described in
subsection (2) of this section for no more than one year from the date the  notice of overdose
is provided to a practitioner.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 431A.865 (3)(a)(H), the authority or a third party may not pro-
vide the practitioner  information used under subsection (2) of this section to a health pro-
fessional regulatory board for disciplinary purposes.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 1, 2028.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 2 of this 2024 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take  any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the authority to exercise, on and after
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the authority by section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2024 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4150 (HB 4150-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 14, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 28, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4150 (HB 4150-INTRO) Page 2